Missouri, session 2026, HB2839.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 170.011, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 170.011, to read as follows:
170.011. 1. Regular courses of instruction in the Constitution of the United States
and of the state of Missouri and in American history and institutions shall be given in all
public and private schools in the state of Missouri, except proprietary schools, and shall begin
not later than the seventh grade and continue in high school to an extent determined by the
state commissioner of education, and shall continue in college and university courses to an
extent determined by the state commissioner of higher education. In the 1990-91 school year
and each year thereafter, local school districts maintaining high schools shall comply with the
provisions of this section by offering in grade nine, ten, eleven, or twelve a course of
instruction in the institutions, branches and functions of the government of the state of
Missouri, including local governments, and of the government of the United States, and in the
electoral process. A local school district maintaining such a high school shall require that
prior to the completion of the twelfth grade each pupil who receives a high school diploma or
certificate of graduation on or after January 1, 1994, shall satisfactorily complete such a
course of study. Such course shall be of at least one semester in length and may be two
semesters in length. The department of elementary and secondary education may provide
assistance in developing such a course if the district requests assistance. A school district
may elect to waive the requirements of this subsection for any student who transfers from
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2839 2
outside the state to a Missouri high school if the student can furnish documentation deemed
acceptable by the school district of the student's successful completion in any year from the
ninth through the twelfth grade of a course of instruction in the institutions, branches, and
functions of state government, including local governments, and of the government of the
United States, and in the electoral process.
2. American history courses at the elementary and secondary levels shall include in
their proper time-line sequence specific referrals to the details and events of the racial
equality movement that have caused major changes in United States and Missouri laws and
attitudes.
3. (1) No pupil shall receive a certificate of graduation from any public or private
school other than private trade schools unless he or she has satisfactorily passed [an] a
statewide standardized examination on the provisions and principles of the Constitution of
the United States and of the state of Missouri, and in American history, American institutions,
and American civics. The state board of education shall form a committee composed of
former teachers who have served in elective public office to develop such examination.
Such committee shall be staffed by the State Historical Society of Missouri. Upon the
approval of such examination by the state board of education, such examination shall be
the examination administered under this subsection.
(2) A school district may elect to waive the requirements of this subsection for any
student who transfers from outside the state to a Missouri high school if the student can
furnish documentation deemed acceptable by the school district of the student's successful
completion in any year from the ninth through the twelfth grade of a course of instruction in
the institutions, branches, and functions of state government, including local governments,
and of the government of the United States, and in the electoral process.
(3) A student of a college or university, who, after having completed a course of
instruction prescribed in this section and successfully passed an examination on the United
States Constitution, and in American history and American institutions required hereby,
transfers to another college or university, is not required to complete another such course or
pass another such examination as a condition precedent to [his] such student's graduation
from the college or university.
4. In the 1990-91 school year and each year thereafter, each school district
maintaining a high school may annually nominate to the state board of education a student
who has demonstrated knowledge of the principles of government and citizenship through
academic achievement, participation in extracurricular activities, and service to the
community. Annually, the state board of education shall select fifteen students from those
nominated by the local school districts and shall recognize and award them for their academic
achievement, participation and service.

HB 2839 3
5. The provisions of this section shall not apply to students from foreign countries
who are enrolled in public or private high schools in Missouri, if such students are foreign
exchange students sponsored by a national organization recognized by the department of
elementary and secondary education.
✔